test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aappal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ääppal contract stem koillinen: # Noun - full paradigm
     ääppal+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ääppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: äppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: äppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: äppla
     ääppal+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: äpplest
     ääppal+N+Sg+Com+Indef: äpplin
     ääppal+N+Ess+Indef: äpplen
     ääppal+N+Par+Indef: äppled
     ääppal+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [äppaltaa, äppaltää]
     ääppal+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: äppal
     ääppal+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: äppli
     ääppal+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: äpplid
     ääppal+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: äpplid
     ääppal+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: äpplin
     ääppal+N+Pl+Com+Indef: äpplivuiʹm
     ääppal+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [äpplitaa, äpplitää]
     
